Texas statutes.
CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

TITLE 1. CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

CHAPTER 63. MISSING CHILDREN AND MISSING PERSONS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Art. 63.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Abduct" has the meaning assigned by Section 20.01, Penal Code.

(1-a) "Child" means a person under 18 years of age.

(2) "Missing person" means a person 18 years old or older whose disappearance is possibly not voluntary.

(3) "Missing child" means a child whose whereabouts are unknown to the child's legal custodian, the circumstances of whose absence indicate that:

(A) the child did not voluntarily leave the care and control of the custodian, and the taking of the child was not authorized by law;

(B) the child voluntarily left the care and control of the custodian without the custodian's consent and without intent to return;

(C) the child was taken or retained in violation of the terms of a court order for possession of or access to the child; or

(D) the child was taken or retained without the permission of the custodian and with the effect of depriving the custodian of possession of or access to the child unless the taking or retention of the child was prompted by the commission or attempted commission of family violence, as defined by Section 71.004, Family Code, against the child or the actor.

(4) "Missing child" or "missing person" also includes a person of any age who is missing and:

(A) is under proven physical or mental disability or is senile, and because of one or more of these conditions is subject to immediate danger or is a danger to others;

(B) is in the company of another person or is in a situation the circumstances of which indicate that the missing child's or missing person's safety is in doubt; or

(C) is unemancipated as defined by the law of this state.

(5) "Missing child or missing person report" means information that is:

(A) given to a law enforcement agency on a form used for sending information to the national crime information center; and

(B) about a child or missing person whose whereabouts are unknown to the reporter and who is alleged in the form by the reporter to be missing.

(6) "Legal custodian of a child" means a parent of a child if no managing conservator or guardian of the person of the child has been appointed, the managing conservator of a child or a guardian of a child if a managing conservator or guardian has been appointed for the child, a possessory conservator of a child if the child is absent from the possessory conservator of the child at a time when the possessory conservator is entitled to possession of the child and the child is not believed to be with the managing conservator, or any other person who has assumed temporary care and control of a child if at the time of disappearance the child was not living with his parent, guardian, managing conservator, or possessory conservator.

(7) "Clearinghouse" means the missing children and missing persons information clearinghouse.

(8) "Law enforcement agency" means a police department of a city in this state, a sheriff of a county in this state, or the Department of Public Safety.

(9) "Possible match" occurs if the similarities between an unidentified body and a missing child or person would lead one to believe they are the same person.

(10) "City or state agency" means an employment commission, the Texas Department of Human Services, the Texas Department of Transportation, and any other agency that is funded or supported by the state or a city government.

(11) "Birth certificate agency" means a municipal or county official that records and maintains birth certificates and the bureau of vital statistics.

(12) "Bureau of vital statistics" means the bureau of vital statistics of the Texas Department of Health.

(13) "School" means a public primary school or private primary school that charges a fee for tuition and has more than 25 students enrolled and attending courses at a single location.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 657, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1052, Sec. 7.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.001 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 22(43), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 178, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 51, Sec. 1; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1084, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.001 and amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Subd. (3) amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 3.10, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.001 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 840 (H.B. 3439), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1019 (H.B. 2662), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1100 (S.B. 1551), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 571 (S.B. 742), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Art. 63.0015. PRESUMPTION REGARDING PARENTAGE. For purposes of this chapter, a person named as a child's mother or father in the child's birth certificate is presumed to be the child's parent.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 685, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.0016. ATTEMPTED CHILD ABDUCTION BY RELATIVE. For purposes of this chapter, "attempted child abduction" does not include an attempted abduction in which the actor was a relative, as defined by Section 20.01, Penal Code, of the person intended to be abducted.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 571 (S.B. 742), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Art. 63.002. MISSING CHILDREN AND MISSING PERSONS INFORMATION CLEARINGHOUSE. (a) The missing children and missing persons information clearinghouse is established within the Department of Public Safety.

(b) The clearinghouse is under the administrative direction of the director of the department.

(c) The clearinghouse shall be used by all law enforcement agencies of the state.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.002 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.002 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.002 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.003. FUNCTION OF CLEARINGHOUSE. (a) The clearinghouse is a central repository of information on missing children, missing persons, and attempted child abductions.

(b) The clearinghouse shall:

(1) establish a system of intrastate communication of information relating to missing children and missing persons;

(2) provide a centralized file for the exchange of information on missing children, missing persons, and unidentified dead bodies within the state;

(3) communicate with the national crime information center for the exchange of information on missing children and missing persons suspected of interstate travel;

(4) collect, process, maintain, and disseminate accurate and complete information on missing children and missing persons;

(5) provide a statewide toll-free telephone line for the reporting of missing children and missing persons and for receiving information on missing children and missing persons;

(6) provide and disseminate to legal custodians, law enforcement agencies, and the Texas Education Agency information that explains how to prevent child abduction and what to do if a child becomes missing; and

(7) receive and maintain information on attempted child abductions in this state.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.003 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 6.59, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.003 and amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.003 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 571 (S.B. 742), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Art. 63.004. REPORT FORMS. (a) The Department of Public Safety shall distribute missing children and missing person report forms.

(b) A missing child or missing person report may be made to a law enforcement officer authorized by that department to receive reports in person or by telephone or other indirect method of communication and the officer may enter the information on the form for the reporting person. A report form may also be completed by the reporting person and delivered to a law enforcement officer.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.004 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.004 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.004 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.0041. REPORTING OF ATTEMPTED CHILD ABDUCTION. (a) A local law enforcement agency, on receiving a report of an attempted child abduction, shall as soon as practicable, but not later than eight hours after receiving the report, provide any relevant information regarding the attempted child abduction to the clearinghouse. Information not immediately available shall be obtained by the agency and entered into the clearinghouse as a supplement to the original entry as soon as possible.

(b) A law enforcement officer or local law enforcement agency reporting an attempted child abduction to the clearinghouse shall make the report by use of the Texas Law Enforcement Telecommunications System or a successor system of telecommunication used by law enforcement agencies and operated by the Department of Public Safety.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 571 (S.B. 742), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1016 (H.B. 1503), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Art. 63.005. DISTRIBUTION OF INFORMATION. (a) The clearinghouse shall print and distribute posters, flyers, and other forms of information containing descriptions of missing children.

(b) The clearinghouse shall also provide to the Texas Education Agency information about missing children who may be located in the school systems.

(c) The clearinghouse may also receive information about missing children from the Public Education Information Management System of the Texas Education Agency and from school districts.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.005 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 190, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 6.60, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.005 and amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.005 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.006. RELEASE OF DENTAL RECORDS. (a) At the time a report is made for a missing child, the person to whom the report is given shall give or mail to the reporter a dental record release form. The officer receiving the report shall endorse the form with the notation that a missing child report has been made in compliance with this chapter. When the form is properly completed by the reporter, and contains the endorsement, the form is sufficient to permit any dentist or physician in this state to release dental records relating to the child reported missing.

(b) At any time a report is made for a missing person the law enforcement officer taking the report shall complete a dental release form that states that the person is missing and that there is reason to believe that the person has not voluntarily relocated or removed himself from communications with others and that authorizes the bearer of the release to obtain dental information records from any dentist or physician in this state.

(c) Any person who obtains dental records through the use of the form authorized by this article shall send the records to the clearinghouse.

(d) The judge of any court of record of this state may for good cause shown authorize the release of dental records of a missing child or missing person.

(e) A dentist or physician who releases dental records to a person presenting a proper release executed or ordered under this article is immune from civil liability or criminal prosecution for the release of those records.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.006 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.006 and amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Subsec. (b) amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 685, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.006 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.007. RELEASE OF MEDICAL RECORDS. (a) At the time a report is made for a missing child or adult, the law enforcement officer taking the report shall give a medical record release form to the parent, spouse, adult child, or legal guardian who is making the report. The officer receiving the report shall endorse the form with the notation that a missing child or missing adult report has been made in compliance with this chapter. When the form is properly completed by the parent, spouse, adult child, or legal guardian, and contains the endorsement, the form is sufficient to permit any physician, health care facility, or other licensed health care provider in this state to release to the law enforcement officer presenting the release dental records, blood type, height, weight, X rays, and information regarding scars, allergies, or any unusual illnesses suffered by the person who is reported missing. Except as provided by Subsection (d), a medical record of a missing child may be released only if the medical record release form is signed by a parent or legal guardian.

(b) At any time a report is made for an adult missing person, the law enforcement officer taking the report shall complete a medical release form that states that the person is missing and that there is reason to believe that the person has not voluntarily relocated or removed himself or herself from communications with others. A release under this subsection is not valid unless it is signed by the adult missing person's:

(1) spouse;

(2) adult child who is reasonably available;

(3) parent; or

(4) legal guardian.

(c) A law enforcement officer who obtains medical records under this article shall send a copy of the records to the clearinghouse. A law enforcement officer who obtains records under this article, a law enforcement agency using the records, and the clearinghouse are prohibited from disclosing the information contained in or obtained through the medical records unless permitted by law. Information contained in or obtained through medical records may be used only for purposes directly related to locating the missing person.

(d) The judge of any court of record of this state may for good cause shown authorize the release of pertinent medical records of a missing child or missing adult.

(e) A physician, health care facility, or other licensed health care provider releasing a medical record to a person presenting a proper release executed or ordered under this article is immune from civil liability or criminal prosecution for the release of the record.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 438, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.0065 and amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.007 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999

Art. 63.008. MISSING CHILDREN PROGRAM. (a) The Texas Education Agency shall develop and administer a program for the location of missing children who may be enrolled within the Texas school system, including nonpublic schools, and for the reporting of children who may be missing or who may be unlawfully removed from schools.

(b) The program shall include the use of information received from the missing children and missing persons information clearinghouse and shall be coordinated with the operations of that information clearinghouse.

(c) The State Board of Education may adopt rules for the operation of the program and shall require the participation of all school districts and accredited private schools in this state.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.007 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 6.61, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.007 and amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.008 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.009. LAW ENFORCEMENT REQUIREMENTS GENERALLY. (a) A law enforcement agency, on receiving a report of a missing person, shall:

(1) if the subject of the report is a person who is known by the agency to have or is reported to have chronic dementia, including Alzheimer's dementia, whether caused by illness, brain defect, or brain injury, immediately start an investigation in order to determine the present location of the person;

(2) if the subject of the report is a person other than a person described by Subdivision (1), start an investigation with due diligence in order to determine the present location of the person;

(3) immediately, but not later than two hours after receiving the report, enter the name of the person into the clearinghouse and the national crime information center missing person file if the person meets the center's criteria, and report that name to the Alzheimer's Association Safe Return emergency response center if applicable, with all available identifying features such as dental records, fingerprints, other physical characteristics, and a description of the clothing worn when last seen, and all available information describing any person reasonably believed to have taken or retained the missing person;

(4) not later than 48 hours after receiving the report, electronically submit to each municipal or county law enforcement agency within 200 miles the report and any information that may help determine the present location of the person;

(5) not later than the 60th day after the date the agency receives the report, enter the name of the person into the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System, with all available identifying features such as dental records, fingerprints, other physical characteristics, and a description of the clothing worn when last seen, and all available information describing any person reasonably believed to have taken or retained the missing person; and

(6) inform the person who filed the report of the missing person that the information will be:

(A) entered into the clearinghouse, the national crime information center missing person file, and the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System;

(B) reported to the Alzheimer's Association Safe Return emergency response center if applicable; and

(C) submitted to each municipal or county law enforcement agency within 200 miles.

(a-1) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2660), Sec. 9(1), and Ch. 979 (S.B. 2429), Sec. 8(1), eff. September 1, 2023.

(a-2) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2660), Sec. 9(1), and Ch. 979 (S.B. 2429), Sec. 8(1), eff. September 1, 2023.

(a-3) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1016 (H.B. 1503), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

(b) Information not immediately available when the original entry is made shall be entered into the clearinghouse, the national crime information center file, and the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System as a supplement to the original entry as soon as possible.

(c) All Texas law enforcement agencies are required to enter information about all unidentified bodies into the clearinghouse and the national crime information center unidentified person file. A law enforcement agency shall, not later than the 10th working day after the date the death is reported to the agency, enter all available identifying features of the unidentified body (fingerprints, dental records, any unusual physical characteristics, and a description of the clothing found on the body) into the clearinghouse and the national crime information center file. If an information entry into the national crime information center file results in an automatic entry of the information into the clearinghouse, the law enforcement agency is not required to make a direct entry of that information into the clearinghouse.

(d) If a local law enforcement agency investigating a report of a missing person obtains a warrant for the arrest of a person for taking or retaining the missing person, the local law enforcement agency shall immediately enter the name and other descriptive information of the person into the national crime information center wanted person file if the person meets the center's criteria. The local law enforcement agency shall also enter all available identifying features, including dental records, fingerprints, and other physical characteristics of the missing person. The information shall be cross-referenced with the information in the national crime information center missing person file.

(e) A local law enforcement agency that has access to the national crime information center database shall cooperate with other law enforcement agencies in entering or retrieving information from the national crime information center database.

(f) Immediately after the return of a missing person or the identification of an unidentified body, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction of the investigation shall:

(1) clear the entry in the national crime information center database; and

(2) notify the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2660), Sec. 9(1), and Ch. 979 (S.B. 2429), Sec. 8(1), eff. September 1, 2023.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 657, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 1987. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.008 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 190, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 51, Sec. 2, eff. May 7, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 771, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.008 and amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Subsec. (a) amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 3.11, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 685, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Subsec. (g) added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 3.12, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 685, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.009 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Subsec. (g) amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 3.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1130 (H.B. 943), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 571 (S.B. 742), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 1206), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 745 (H.B. 1793), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(6), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1016 (H.B. 1503), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 250 (H.B. 1419), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2660), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2660), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2660), Sec. 9(1), eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 979 (S.B. 2429), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 979 (S.B. 2429), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 979 (S.B. 2429), Sec. 8(1), eff. September 1, 2023.

Art. 63.00905. LAW ENFORCEMENT REQUIREMENTS FOR REPORT OF MISSING CHILD.

Text of subsection as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2660), Sec. 5

(a) Regardless of the jurisdiction in which the child went missing, a law enforcement agency, on receiving a report of a missing child, shall:

(1) immediately start an investigation in order to determine the present location of the child;

(2) immediately, but not later than two hours after receiving the report, enter the name of the child into the clearinghouse and the national crime information center missing person file if the child meets the center's criteria, with all available identifying features such as dental records, fingerprints, other physical characteristics, and a description of the clothing worn when last seen, and all available information describing any person reasonably believed to have taken or retained the missing child;

(3) immediately, but not later than two hours after the agency receives the report, enter the applicable information into the Texas Law Enforcement Telecommunications System or a successor system of telecommunication used by law enforcement agencies and operated by the Department of Public Safety;

(4) not later than 48 hours after receiving the report, electronically submit to each municipal or county law enforcement agency within 200 miles the report and any information that may help determine the present location of the child;

(5) not later than the 30th day after the date the agency receives the report, enter the name of the child into the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System, with all available identifying features such as dental records, fingerprints, other physical characteristics, and a description of the clothing worn when last seen, and all available information describing any person reasonably believed to have taken or retained the missing child; and

(6) inform the person who filed the report of the missing child that the information will be:

(A) entered into the clearinghouse, the national crime information center missing person file, and the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System; and

(B) submitted to each municipal or county law enforcement agency within 200 miles.

Text of subsection as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 979 (S.B. 2429), Sec. 4

(a) Regardless of the jurisdiction in which the child went missing, a law enforcement agency, on receiving a report of a missing child, shall:

(1) immediately start an investigation in order to determine the present location of the child;

(2) immediately, but not later than two hours after receiving the report, enter the name of the child into the clearinghouse and the national crime information center missing person file if the child meets the center's criteria, with all available identifying features such as dental records, fingerprints, other physical characteristics, and a description of the clothing worn when last seen, and all available information describing any person reasonably believed to have taken or retained the missing child;

(3) immediately, but not later than two hours after the agency receives the report, enter the applicable information into the Texas Law Enforcement Telecommunications System or a successor system of telecommunication used by law enforcement agencies and operated by the Department of Public Safety;

(4) not later than the 30th day after the date the agency receives the report, enter the name of the child into the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System, with all available identifying features such as dental records, fingerprints, other physical characteristics, and a description of the clothing worn when last seen, and all available information describing any person reasonably believed to have taken or retained the missing child; and

(5) inform the person who filed the report of the missing child that the information will be entered into the clearinghouse, the national crime information center missing person file, and the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System.

(b) A local law enforcement agency, on receiving a report of a child missing under the circumstances described by Article 63.001(3)(D) for a period of not less than 48 hours, shall immediately make a reasonable effort to locate the child and determine the well-being of the child. On determining the location of the child, if the agency has reason to believe that the child is a victim of abuse or neglect as defined by Section 261.001, Family Code, the agency:

(1) shall notify the Department of Family and Protective Services; and

(2) may take possession of the child under Subchapter B, Chapter 262, Family Code.

(c) The Department of Family and Protective Services, on receiving notice under Subsection (b), may initiate an investigation into the allegation of abuse or neglect under Section 261.301, Family Code, and take possession of the child under Chapter 262, Family Code.

(d) Information not immediately available when the original entry is made shall be entered into the clearinghouse, the national crime information center file, and the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System as a supplement to the original entry as soon as possible.

(e) If a local law enforcement agency investigating a report of a missing child obtains a warrant for the arrest of a person for taking or retaining the missing child, the local law enforcement agency shall immediately enter the name and other descriptive information of the person into the national crime information center wanted person file if the person meets the center's criteria. The local law enforcement agency shall also enter all available identifying features, including dental records, fingerprints, and other physical characteristics of the missing child. The information shall be cross-referenced with the information in the national crime information center missing person file.

(f) Immediately after the return of a missing child, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction of the investigation shall:

(1) clear the entry in the national crime information center database; and

(2) notify the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System.

(g) On determining the location of a child, other than a child who is subject to the continuing jurisdiction of a district court, an officer shall take possession of the child and shall deliver or arrange for the delivery of the child to a person entitled to possession of the child. If the person entitled to possession of the child is not immediately available, the law enforcement officer shall deliver the child to the Department of Family and Protective Services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2660), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2023.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 979 (S.B. 2429), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Art. 63.0091. LAW ENFORCEMENT REQUIREMENTS REGARDING REPORTS OF CERTAIN MISSING CHILDREN. (a) The public safety director of the Department of Public Safety shall adopt rules regarding the procedures for a local law enforcement agency on receiving a report of a missing child who:

(1) had been reported missing on four or more occasions in the 24-month period preceding the date of the current report;

(2) is in foster care or in the conservatorship of the Department of Family and Protective Services and had been reported missing on two or more occasions in the 24-month period preceding the date of the current report; or

(3) is at a high risk of human trafficking, sexual assault, exploitation, abuse, or neglectful supervision for any reason the agency considers to be high risk, including because the missing child:

(A) disappeared while in a dangerous environment;

(B) has mental or behavioral health needs;

(C) previously exhibited signs of mental illness;

(D) has an intellectual or developmental disability; or

(E) is known to have been last seen or in communication with an adult unknown to the child's family or legal guardian.

(b) The rules adopted under this article must require that:

(1) in entering information regarding the report into the national crime information center missing person file as required by Article 63.00905(a)(2) for a missing child described by Subsection (a), the local law enforcement agency shall indicate, in the manner specified in the rules, that the child is at a high risk of harm and include relevant information regarding:

(A) any prior occasions on which the child was reported missing; and

(B) the circumstances considered when designating the child as high risk; and

(2) the local law enforcement agency that receives a report of a missing child described by Subsection (a)(3) shall:

(A) reasonably escalate the response; and

(B) immediately, but not later than two hours after receiving the report, notify all law enforcement agencies within 100 miles, including agencies from other states, of the circumstances and high risk designation of the missing child.

(c) If, at the time the initial entry into the national crime information center missing person file is made, the local law enforcement agency has not determined that the requirements of this article apply to the report of the missing child, the information required by Subsection (b)(1) must be added to the entry promptly after the agency investigating the report or the Department of Public Safety determines that the missing child is described by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 571 (S.B. 742), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 745 (H.B. 1793), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2660), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 979 (S.B. 2429), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2023.

Art. 63.010. ATTORNEY GENERAL TO REQUIRE COMPLIANCE. The attorney general shall require each law enforcement agency to comply with this chapter and may seek writs of mandamus or other appropriate remedies to enforce this chapter.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.009 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.009 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.010 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.011. MISSING CHILDREN INVESTIGATIONS. On the written request made to a law enforcement agency by a parent, foster parent, managing or possessory conservator, guardian of the person or the estate, or other court-appointed custodian of a child whose whereabouts are unknown, the law enforcement agency shall request from the missing children and missing persons information clearinghouse information concerning the child that may aid the person making the request in the identification or location of the child.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.010 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.010 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.011 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.012. REPORT OF INQUIRY. A law enforcement agency to which a request has been made under Article 63.011 of this code shall report to the parent on the results of its inquiry within 14 days after the day that the written request is filed with the law enforcement agency.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.011 and amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), (27), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.011 and amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.012 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.02(1), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.013. INFORMATION TO CLEARINGHOUSE. Each law enforcement agency shall provide to the missing children and missing persons information clearinghouse:

(1) any information that would assist in the location or identification of any missing child who has been reported to the agency as missing; and

(2) any information regarding an attempted child abduction that has been reported to the agency or that the agency has received from any person or another agency.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.012 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.012 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.013 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 571 (S.B. 742), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Art. 63.014. CROSS-CHECKING AND MATCHING. (a) The clearinghouse shall cross-check and attempt to match unidentified bodies with missing children or missing persons. When the clearinghouse discovers a possible match between an unidentified body and a missing child or missing person, the Department of Public Safety shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agencies.

(b) Those law enforcement agencies that receive notice of a possible match shall make arrangements for positive identification and complete and close out the investigation with notification to the clearinghouse.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.013 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.013 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.014 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.015. AVAILABILITY OF INFORMATION THROUGH OTHER AGENCIES. (a) On the request of any law enforcement agency, a city or state agency shall furnish the law enforcement agency with any information about a missing child or missing person that will assist in completing the investigation.

(b) The information given under Subsection (a) of this article is confidential and may not be released to any other person outside of the law enforcement agency.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1985. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 74.014 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.014 and amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.015 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.016. DONATIONS. The Department of Public Safety may accept money donated from any source to assist in financing the activities and purposes of the missing children and missing persons information clearinghouse.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 894, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1987. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.015 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.016 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.017. CONFIDENTIALITY OF CERTAIN RECORDS. Clearinghouse records that relate to the investigation by a law enforcement agency of a missing child, a missing person, or an unidentified body and records or notations that the clearinghouse maintains for internal use in matters relating to missing children, missing persons, or unidentified bodies are confidential.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 190, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.016 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.017 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.018. DEATH CERTIFICATES. A physician who performs a postmortem examination on the body of an unidentified person shall complete and file a death certificate in accordance with Chapter 193, Health and Safety Code. The physician shall note on the certificate the name of the law enforcement agency that submitted the body for examination and shall send a copy of the certificate to the clearinghouse not later than the 10th working day after the date the physician files the certificate.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 62.018 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(A), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.019. SCHOOL RECORDS SYSTEM. (a) On enrollment of a child under 11 years of age in a school for the first time at the school, the school shall:

(1) request from the person enrolling the child the name of each previous school attended by the child;

(2) request from each school identified in Subdivision (1), the school records for the child and, if the person enrolling the child provides copies of previous school records, request verification from the school of the child's name, address, birth date, and grades and dates attended; and

(3) notify the person enrolling the student that not later than the 30th day after enrollment, or the 90th day if the child was not born in the United States, the person must provide:

(A) a certified copy of the child's birth certificate; or

(B) other reliable proof of the child's identity and age and a signed statement explaining the person's inability to produce a copy of the child's birth certificate.

(b) If a person enrolls a child under 11 years of age in school and does not provide the valid prior school information or documentation required by this section, the school shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agency before the 31st day after the person fails to comply with this section. On receipt of notification, the law enforcement agency shall immediately check the clearinghouse to determine if the child has been reported missing. If the child has been reported missing, the law enforcement agency shall immediately notify other appropriate law enforcement agencies that the missing child has been located.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1084, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.017 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(B), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.020. DUTY OF SCHOOLS AND OTHER ENTITIES TO FLAG MISSING CHILDREN'S RECORDS. (a) When a report that a child under 11 years of age is missing is received by a law enforcement agency, the agency shall immediately notify each school and day care facility that the child attended or in which the child was enrolled as well as the bureau of vital statistics, if the child was born in the state, that the child is missing.

(b) On receipt of notice that a child under 11 years of age is missing, the bureau of vital statistics shall notify the appropriate municipal or county birth certificate agency that the child is missing.

(c) A school, day care facility, or birth certificate agency that receives notice concerning a child under this section shall flag the child's records that are maintained by the school, facility, or agency.

(d) The law enforcement agency shall notify the clearinghouse that the notification required under this section has been made. The clearinghouse shall provide the notice required under this section if the clearinghouse determines that the notification has not been made by the law enforcement agency.

(e) If a missing child under 11 years of age, who was the subject of a missing child report made in this state, was born in or attended a school or licensed day care facility in another state, the law enforcement agency shall notify law enforcement or the missing and exploited children clearinghouse in each appropriate state regarding the missing child and request the law enforcement agency or clearinghouse to contact the state birth certificate agency and each school or licensed day care facility the missing child attended to flag the missing child's records.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1084, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.018 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(B), eff. Sept. 1, 1999

Art. 63.021. SYSTEM FOR FLAGGING RECORDS. (a) On receipt of notification by a law enforcement agency or the clearinghouse regarding a missing child under 11 years of age, the school, day care facility, or birth certificate agency shall maintain the child's records in its possession so that on receipt of a request regarding the child, the school, day care facility, or agency will be able to notify law enforcement or the clearinghouse that a request for a flagged record has been made.

(b) When a request concerning a flagged record is made in person, the school, day care facility, or agency may not advise the requesting party that the request concerns a missing child and shall:

(1) require the person requesting the flagged record to complete a form stating the person's name, address, telephone number, and relationship to the child for whom a request is made and the name, address, and birth date of the child;

(2) obtain a copy of the requesting party's driver's license or other photographic identification, if possible;

(3) if the request is for a birth certificate, inform the requesting party that a copy of a certificate will be sent by mail; and

(4) immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement agency that a request has been made concerning a flagged record and include a physical description of the requesting party, the identity and address of the requesting party, and a copy of the requesting party's driver's license or other photographic identification.

(c) After providing the notification required under Subsection (a)(4), the school, day care facility, or agency shall mail a copy of the requested record to the requesting party on or after the 21st day after the date of the request.

(d) When a request concerning a flagged record is made in writing, the school, day care facility, or agency may not advise the party that the request concerns a missing child and shall immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement agency that a request has been made concerning a flagged record and provide to the law enforcement agency a copy of the written request. After providing the notification under this subsection, the school, day care facility, or agency shall mail a copy of the requested record to the requesting party on or after the 21st day after the date of the request.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1084, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.019 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(B), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Art. 63.022. REMOVAL OF FLAG FROM RECORDS. (a) On the return of a missing child under 11 years of age, the law enforcement agency shall notify each school or day care facility that has maintained flagged records for the child and the bureau of vital statistics that the child is no longer missing. The law enforcement agency shall notify the clearinghouse that notification under this section has been made. The bureau of vital statistics shall notify the appropriate municipal or county birth certificate agency. The clearinghouse shall notify the school, day care facility, or bureau of vital statistics that the missing child is no longer missing if the clearinghouse determines that the notification was not provided by the law enforcement agency.

(b) On notification by the law enforcement agency or the clearinghouse that a missing child has been recovered, the school, day care facility, or birth certificate agency that maintained flagged records shall remove the flag from the records.

(c) A school, day care facility, or birth certificate agency that has reason to believe a missing child has been recovered may request confirmation that the missing child has been recovered from the appropriate law enforcement agency or the clearinghouse. If a response is not received after the 45th day after the date of the request for confirmation, the school, day care facility, or birth certificate agency may remove the flag from the record and shall inform the law enforcement agency or the clearinghouse that the flag has been removed.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1084, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 79.020 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(8)(B), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER B. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS HEALTH SCIENCE CENTER AT FORT WORTH MISSING PERSONS DNA DATABASE

Art. 63.051. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of regents of the University of North Texas System.

(2) "Center" means the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth.

(3) "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid.

(4) "DNA database" means the database containing forensic DNA analysis results, including any known name of the person who is the subject of the forensic DNA analysis, that is maintained by the center.

(5) "High-risk missing person" means:

(A) a person missing as a result of an abduction by a stranger;

(B) a person missing under suspicious or unknown circumstances; or

(C) a person who has been missing more than 30 days, or less than 30 days at the discretion of the investigating agency, if there is reason to believe that the person is in danger or deceased.

(6) "Law enforcement agency" means the law enforcement agency primarily responsible for investigating a report of a high-risk missing person.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Art. 63.0515. CRIMINAL JUSTICE AGENCY. For purposes of this subchapter, the center is a criminal justice agency that performs forensic DNA analyses on evidence, including evidence related to a case involving unidentified human remains or a high-risk missing person. The center shall comply with 42 U.S.C. Section 14132.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 320 (H.B. 2385), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Art. 63.052. ESTABLISHMENT OF DNA DATABASE FOR MISSING OR UNIDENTIFIED PERSONS. (a) The board shall develop at the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth a DNA database for any case based on the report of unidentified human remains or a report of a high-risk missing person.

(b) The database may be used to identify unidentified human remains and high-risk missing persons.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 320, Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 320 (H.B. 2385), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 320 (H.B. 2385), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Art. 63.053. INFORMATION STORED IN DATABASE. (a) The database required in Article 63.052 may contain only DNA genetic markers that are commonly recognized as appropriate for human identification. Except to the extent that those markers are appropriate for human identification, the database may not contain DNA genetic markers that predict biological function. The center shall select the DNA genetic markers for inclusion in the DNA database based on existing technology for forensic DNA analysis.

(b) The results of the forensic DNA analysis must be compatible with the CODIS DNA database established by the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the center must make the results available for inclusion in that database.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Art. 63.054. COMPARISON OF SAMPLES. The center shall compare DNA samples taken from unidentified human remains with DNA samples taken from personal articles belonging to high-risk missing persons or from parents of high-risk missing persons or other appropriate persons.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Art. 63.055. STANDARDS COLLECTION; STORAGE. In consultation with the center, the board by rule shall develop standards and guidelines for the collection of DNA samples submitted to the center and the center's storage of DNA samples.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Art. 63.056. COLLECTION OF SAMPLES FROM UNIDENTIFIED HUMAN REMAINS. (a) A physician acting on the request of a justice of the peace under Subchapter A, Chapter 49, a county coroner, a county medical examiner, or other law enforcement entity, as appropriate, shall collect samples from unidentified human remains. The justice of the peace, coroner, medical examiner, or other law enforcement entity shall submit those samples to the center for forensic DNA analysis and inclusion of the results in the DNA database.

(b) After the center has performed the forensic DNA analysis, the center shall return the remaining sample to the entity that submitted the sample under Subsection (a).

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Art. 63.057. DUTY OF LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY TO NOTIFY APPROPRIATE PERSONS REGARDING PROVISION OF VOLUNTARY SAMPLE. Not later than the 30th day after the date a report of a high-risk missing person is filed, the law enforcement agency shall inform a parent or any other person considered appropriate by the agency that the person may provide:

(1) a DNA sample for forensic DNA analysis; or

(2) for purposes of DNA sampling, a personal article belonging to the high-risk missing person.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Art. 63.058. RELEASE FORM. (a) The center shall develop a standard release form that authorizes a parent or other appropriate person to voluntarily provide under Article 63.057 a DNA sample or a personal article for purposes of DNA sampling. The release must explain that the DNA sample is to be used only to identify the high-risk missing person.

(b) A law enforcement agency may not use any form of incentive or coercion to compel the parent or other appropriate person to provide a sample or article under this subchapter.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Art. 63.059. PROTOCOL FOR OBTAINING SAMPLES RELATING TO HIGH-RISK MISSING PERSONS. (a) The law enforcement agency shall take DNA samples from parents or other appropriate persons under Article 63.057 in any manner prescribed by the center.

(b) The center shall develop a model kit to be used by a law enforcement agency to take DNA samples from parents or other appropriate persons.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Art. 63.060. SUBMISSION OF SAMPLE TO CENTER. (a) Before submitting to the center a DNA sample obtained under Article 63.057, the law enforcement agency shall reverify the status of a high-risk missing person.

(b) As soon as practicable after a DNA sample is obtained, the law enforcement agency shall submit the DNA sample, a copy of the missing person's report, and any supplemental information to the center.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Art. 63.061. DESTRUCTION OF SAMPLES. All DNA samples extracted from a living person shall be destroyed after a positive identification is made and a report is issued.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Art. 63.062. CONFIDENTIALITY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the results of a forensic DNA analysis performed by the center are confidential.

(b) The center may disclose the results of a forensic DNA analysis only to:

(1) personnel of the center;

(2) law enforcement agencies;

(3) justices of the peace, coroners, medical examiners, or other law enforcement entities submitting a sample to the center under Article 63.056;

(4) attorneys representing the state; and

(5) a parent or other appropriate person voluntarily providing a DNA sample or an article under Article 63.057.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Art. 63.063. CRIMINAL PENALTY. (a) A person who collects, processes, or stores a DNA sample from a living person for forensic DNA analysis under this subchapter commits an offense if the person intentionally violates Article 63.061 or 63.062.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Art. 63.064. CIVIL PENALTY. A person who collects, processes, or stores a DNA sample from a living person for forensic DNA analysis under this subchapter and who intentionally violates Article 63.061 or 63.062 is liable in civil damages to the donor of the DNA in the amount of $5,000 for each violation, plus reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Art. 63.065. MISSING PERSONS DNA DATABASE FUND. (a) The missing persons DNA database fund is a separate account in the general revenue fund.

(b) Notwithstanding Article 56B.453(a), the legislature may appropriate money in the compensation to victims of crime fund and the compensation to victims of crime auxiliary fund to fund the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth missing persons DNA database. Legislative appropriations under this subsection shall be deposited to the credit of the account created under Subsection (a).

(c) Money in the account may be used only for purposes of developing and maintaining the DNA database as described by this section.

(d) The center may use money in the account only to:

(1) establish and maintain center infrastructure;

(2) pay the costs of DNA sample storage, forensic DNA analysis, and labor costs for cases of high-risk missing persons and unidentified human remains;

(3) reimburse counties for the purposes of pathology and exhumation as considered necessary by the center;

(4) publicize the DNA database for the purpose of contacting parents and other appropriate persons so that they may provide a DNA sample or a personal article for DNA sampling;

(5) educate law enforcement officers about the DNA database and DNA sampling; and

(6) provide outreach programs related to the purposes of this chapter.

(e) Section 403.095(b), Government Code, does not apply to the account established under Subsection (a).

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.22, eff. January 1, 2021.

Art. 63.066. BACKLOG OF UNIDENTIFIED HUMAN REMAINS: ADVISORY COMMITTEE AND OUTSOURCING. (a) The center shall create an advisory committee, consisting of medical examiners, law enforcement officials, and other interested persons as determined appropriate by the center, to impose priorities regarding the identification of the backlog of high-risk missing person cases and unidentified human remains.

(b) The center shall use any available federal funding to assist in reducing the backlog of high-risk missing person cases and unidentified human remains.

(c) The reduction of the backlog may be outsourced to other appropriate laboratories at the center's discretion.

Transferred from Education Code, Subchapter I, Chapter 105 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 319 (S.B. 651), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.